Illinois, session 104th, HB3715.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Nondiscrimination in State Contracts and Grants Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. For the purposes of this Act: 7    "Sexual orientation change efforts" or "conversion 8therapy" means any practices or treatments that seek to change 9an individual's sexual orientation, as defined by subsection 10(O-1) of Section 1-103 of the Illinois Human Rights Act, 11including efforts to change behaviors or gender expressions or 12to eliminate or reduce sexual or romantic attractions or 13feelings towards individuals of the same sex. "Sexual 14orientation change efforts" or "conversion therapy" does not 15include counseling or mental health services that provide 16acceptance, support, and understanding of a person without 17seeking to change sexual orientation or mental health services 18that facilitate a person's coping, social support, and gender 19identity exploration and development, including sexual 20orientation neutral interventions to prevent or address 21unlawful conduct or unsafe sexual practices, without seeking 22to change sexual orientation.   HB3715- 2 -LRB104 11230 HLH 21312 b1    Section 10. Prohibited State contracts and grants. A State 2agency or employee is prohibited from awarding a contract or 3grant to any person, business, or entity that engages in 4discrimination as defined in this Act. The Department of 5Central Management Services is authorized to adopt rules to 6implement this Act.